Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5792.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 383b. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), a person that knowingly and maliciously interferes with the operational technology of a covered critical infrastructure facility is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years, a fine of not more than $250,000.00, or both. (2) If the violation of subsection (1) disrupts an emergency service, hospital, or water system, or causes damage in excess of $1,000,000.00, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 30 years, a fine of not more than $300,000.00, or both. (3) This section does not apply to a lawful protest, labor activity, authorized research, or law enforcement. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Covered critical infrastructure facility" includes all of the following: (i) An electric substation or grid control center serving 5,000 or more customers. (ii) A battery energy storage system with storage capacity greater than 1 megawatt. (iii) A water or wastewater facility serving 1,000 or more connections. (iv) A data center with a connected load of 10 or more megawatts. (v) A natural gas storage or compression facility. (b) "Knowingly and maliciously" means intentional, unauthorized conduct to cause disruption or public safety risk. (c) "Operational technology" means a system controlling physical devices or processes. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.